Illinois, session 104th, HB1719.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-204.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-204.1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-204.1)7    Sec. 11-204.1. Aggravated fleeing or attempting to elude a 8peace officer.9    (a) The offense of aggravated fleeing or attempting to 10elude a peace officer is committed by any driver or operator of 11a motor vehicle who flees or attempts to elude a peace officer, 12after being given a visual or audible signal by a peace officer 13in the manner prescribed in subsection (a) of Section 11-204 14of this Code, and such flight or attempt to elude:15        (1) is at a rate of speed at least 21 miles per hour 16    over the legal speed limit;17        (2) causes bodily injury to any individual;18        (3) causes damage in excess of $300 to property;19        (4) involves disobedience of 2 or more official 20    traffic control devices; or21        (5) involves the concealing or altering of the 22    vehicle's registration plate or digital registration 23    plate.   HB1719- 2 -LRB104 03272 LNS 13294 b1    (b) Any person convicted of a first violation of this 2Section shall be guilty of a Class 2 4 felony. Upon notice of 3such a conviction the Secretary of State shall forthwith 4revoke the driver's license of the person so convicted, as 5provided in Section 6-205 of this Code. Any person convicted 6of a second or subsequent violation of this Section shall be 7guilty of a Class 1 3 felony, and upon notice of such a 8conviction the Secretary of State shall forthwith revoke the 9driver's license of the person convicted, as provided in 10Section 6-205 of the Code.11    (c) The motor vehicle used in a violation of this Section 12is subject to seizure and forfeiture as provided in Sections 1336-1 and 36-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012.14(Source: P.A. 101-395, eff. 8-16-19.)